Hawaii statutes.
§123-7 Battalions and divisions. A
battalion of naval militia shall be considered the equivalent of a battalion of
land militia, and a division of naval militia shall be considered the
equivalent of a company of land militia and equal in the state service, and
they shall be entitled to equal rights, privileges, and allowances when not
inconsistent with law. [L 1915, c 151, pt of §7; RL 1925, §278; RL 1935, §7866;
RL 1945, §13086; RL 1955, §354-7; HRS §123-7]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next